New York, session 2025-2026, A10685.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 345-e to 2 read as follows: 3 § 345-e. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to Chief 4 John "Jack" Blaum, Sr. The bridge over the portion of state route twen- 5 ty-seven, between mile markers fifty-three and fifty-four in the town of 6 Brookhaven, county of Suffolk, shall be dedicated to Chief John "Jack" 7 Blaum, Sr. 8 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 9 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 10 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 11 signage shall state "Bridge Dedicated to Chief John "Jack" Blaum, Sr". 12 However, to avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of 13 commerce, the dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act 14 shall be one of ceremonial nature and the official name of such highway 15 shall not be changed as a result of this act. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15187-02-6